Utah statutes.
41-6a-1405.   Peace officer authorized to move vehicle.

(1)  If a peace officer finds a vehicle in violation of Section 41-6a-1404, the officer may move the vehicle, cause the vehicle to be moved, or require the operator or other person responsible for the vehicle to move the vehicle to a safe position off the highway.

(2)  A peace officer may remove or cause to be removed to a place of safety an unattended vehicle left standing on a highway in:

(a)  violation of this part; or

(b)  a position or under circumstances that the vehicle obstructs the normal movement of traffic.

(3) In accordance with Section 41-6a-1406, a peace officer may remove or cause to be removed to the nearest garage or other place of safety a vehicle found on a highway when:

(a)  the vehicle has been reported stolen or taken without the consent of its owner;

(b)  the person responsible for the vehicle is unable to provide for its custody or removal; or

(c)  the person operating the vehicle is arrested for an alleged offense for which the peace officer is required by law to take the person arrested before a proper magistrate without unnecessary delay.

